Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1235.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-2202, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2202. Duties of the director; qualifications of medical director A. The director shall: 1. Appoint a medical director of the emergency medical services and trauma system. 2. Adopt standards and criteria for the denial or granting of certification and recertification of emergency medical care technicians. These standards shall allow the department to certify qualified emergency medical care technicians who have completed statewide standardized training required under section 36-2204, paragraph 1 and a standardized certification test required under section 36-2204, paragraph 2, who hold valid certification with a national certification organization or who have completed training and testing by the United States armed forces at a level comparable to the national standards for emergency medical care technicians. Before the director may consider approving a statewide standardized training or a standardized certification test, or both, each of these must first be recommended by the medical direction commission and the emergency medical services council to ensure that the standardized training content is consistent with national education standards and that the standardized certification test examines comparable material to that examined in the tests of a national certification organization.  Beginning on the effective date of this amendment to this section or on approval from the federal bureau of investigation, a person applying for initial certification as an emergency medical care technician pursuant to the emergency medical services personnel licensure interstate compact and in compliance with the requirements of section 36-2259 shall possess a valid fingerprint clearance card pursuant to title 41, chapter 12, article 3.1. 3. Adopt standards and criteria that pertain to the quality of emergency care pursuant to section 36-2204. 4. Adopt rules necessary to carry out this chapter. Each rule shall identify all sections and subsections of this chapter under which the rule was formulated. 5. Adopt reasonable medical equipment, supply, staffing and safety standards, criteria and procedures to issue a certificate of registration to operate an ambulance. 6. Maintain a state system for recertifying emergency medical care technicians, except as otherwise provided by section 36-2202.01, that is independent from any national certification organization recertification process. This system shall allow emergency medical care technicians to choose to be recertified under the state or the national certification organization recertification system subject to subsection H of this section. B. Emergency medical technicians who choose the state recertification process shall recertify in one of the following ways: 1. Successfully completing an emergency medical technician refresher course approved by the department. 2. Successfully completing an emergency medical technician challenge course approved by the department. 3. For emergency medical care technicians who are currently certified at the emergency medical technician level by the department, attesting on a form provided by the department that the applicant holds a valid and current cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification, has and will maintain documented proof of a minimum of twenty-four hours of continuing medical education within the last two years consistent with department rules and has functioned in the capacity of an emergency medical technician for at least two hundred forty hours during the last two years. C. After consultation with the emergency medical services council, the director may authorize pilot programs designed to improve the safety and efficiency of ambulance inspections for governmental or quasi-governmental entities that provide emergency medical services in this state. D. The rules, standards and criteria adopted by the director pursuant to subsection A, paragraphs 2, 3, 4 and 5 of this section shall be adopted in accordance with title 41, chapter 6, except that the director may adopt on an emergency basis pursuant to section 41-1026 rules relating to the regulation of ambulance services in this state necessary to protect the public peace, health and safety in advance of adopting rules, standards and criteria as otherwise provided by this subsection. E. The director may waive the requirement for compliance with a protocol adopted pursuant to section 36-2205 if the director determines that the techniques, drug formularies or training makes the protocol inconsistent with contemporary medical practices. F. The director may suspend a protocol adopted pursuant to section 36-2205 if the director does all of the following: 1. Determines that the rule is not in the public's best interest. 2. Initiates procedures pursuant to title 41, chapter 6 to repeal the rule. 3. Notifies all interested parties in writing of the director's action and the reasons for that action. Parties interested in receiving notification shall submit a written request to the director. G. To be eligible for appointment as the medical director of the emergency medical services and trauma system, the person shall be qualified in emergency medicine and shall be licensed as a physician in one of the states of the United States. H. Applicants for certification shall apply to the director for certification. Emergency medical care technicians shall apply for recertification to the director every two years. The director may extend the expiration date of an emergency medical care technician's certificate for thirty days. The department shall establish a fee for this extension by rule. Emergency medical care technicians shall pass an examination administered by the department as a condition for recertification only if required to do so by the advanced life support base hospital's medical director or the emergency medical care technician's medical director. I. The medical director of the emergency medical services and trauma system is exempt from title 41, chapter 4, articles 5 and 6 and is entitled to receive compensation pursuant to section 38-611, subsection A. J. The standards, criteria and procedures adopted by the director pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section shall require that ambulance services: 1. Providing interfacility transportation in any certificate of necessity area of this state have one ambulance attendant as defined in section 36-2201, paragraph 6, subdivision (a), (c), (d) or (e) and one ambulance attendant as defined in section 36-2201, paragraph 6, subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) staffing an ambulance while transporting a patient. If an ambulance attendant as defined in section 36-2201, paragraph 6, subdivision (b) is staffing the ambulance pursuant to this paragraph, that ambulance attendant may exclusively drive the ambulance. 2. Serving a rural or wilderness certificate of necessity area with a population of less than ten thousand persons have at least one ambulance attendant as defined in section 36-2201, paragraph 6, subdivision (a), (c), (d) or (e) and one ambulance attendant as defined in section 36-2201, paragraph 6, subdivision (a) or (b) staffing an ambulance while transporting a patient. 3. Serving a population of ten thousand persons or more have at least one ambulance attendant as defined in section 36-2201, paragraph 6, subdivision (a) and one ambulance attendant as defined in section 36-2201, paragraph 6, subdivision (a), (c), (d) or (e) staffing an ambulance while transporting a patient. K. If the department determines there is not a qualified administrative medical director, the department shall ensure the provision of administrative medical direction for an emergency medical technician if the emergency medical technician meets all of the following criteria: 1. Is employed by a nonprofit or governmental provider employing less than twelve full-time emergency medical technicians. 2. Stipulates to the inability to secure a physician who is willing to provide administrative medical direction. 3. Stipulates that the provider agency does not provide administrative medical direction for its employees.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 36-2220, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2220. Records; confidentiality; definition A. Information developed, records kept and data collected by the department or a political subdivision of this state for the purpose of administering or evaluating the Arizona emergency medical services system or for the trauma system are available to the public except: 1. Any patient record, including clinical records, prehospital care records, medical reports, laboratory statements and reports, any file, film, record or report or oral statement relating to diagnostic findings, treatment or outcome of patients, whether written or recorded, and any information from which a patient, the patient's family or the patient's health care provider or facility might be identified except records, files and information are available to the patient, the patient's guardian or the patient's agent. 2. Information obtained and data collected for purposes of chapter 25 or chapter 4, article 5 of this title. B. Unless otherwise provided by law, all medical records developed and kept by a prehospital component of the statewide trauma system and information contained in these records are confidential and may not be released to the public without written authorization by the patient, the patient's guardian or the patient's agent. C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, a prehospital incident history report completed and kept by a nonhospital political subdivision of this state is available to the public except for information in that report that is protected from disclosure by the laws of this state or federal law, including confidential patient treatment information. D. Patient records and medical records covered by this section may be obtained pursuant to section 12-2294.01. E. Information, documents and records received by the department or prepared by the department in connection with an investigation that is conducted pursuant to this article and that relates to emergency medical care technicians are confidential and are not subject to public inspection or civil discovery. The results of the investigation and the decision of the department are available to the public after the investigation is completed and the investigation file is closed.  This subsection does not prevent the department from submitting information in compliance with the emergency medical services personnel licensure interstate compact as required by section 36-2259. F. For the purposes of this section, "prehospital incident history report" means a record of the prehospital response, nature of the incident and transportation of an emergency medical services patient that is documented on a prehospital incident history report.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 36-2245, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2245. Investigations; complaints; informal interviews; hearings; stipulations; judicial review; civil penalty; confidentiality A. The department may conduct an investigation into the operation of ambulances and ambulance services. B. Proceedings under this section may be initiated by the department. C. If the department receives a written and signed statement of dissatisfaction or dispute of charges or any matter relating to the regulation of ambulance services, the customer is deemed to have filed an informal complaint against the ambulance service. Within fifteen days of receipt of after receiving the complaint, a designated representative of the department shall inform the ambulance service that an informal complaint has been filed, state the nature of the allegations made, specify the purported rule violation and identify specific records relating to the purported rule violation that the ambulance service shall provide to the department.  The ambulance service shall comply with the request for records in a timely manner. D. Within forty-five days of receipt of after receiving the records, the department shall determine if whether the complaint is nonsubstantive or substantive. E. If the department determines that a complaint filed pursuant to this section is nonsubstantive, it the department shall render a written decision to all parties within five days of after that determination.  The complainant may make a formal complaint to the department if the complainant disagrees with the department's decision. If the nonsubstantive complaint involves rates and charges, a designated representative of the department shall attempt to resolve the dispute by correspondence or telephone with the ambulance service and the customer. F. If the department determines that a complaint filed pursuant to this section is substantive, the complaint becomes a formal complaint.  The department shall inform the ambulance service that the initial investigation was substantive in nature and may warrant action pursuant to this article.  The department shall inform the ambulance service of the specific rule violation and shall allow the ambulance service thirty days to answer the complaint in writing. G. The department may issue a written request for an informal interview with the ambulance service if the department believes that the evidence indicates that grounds for action exist.  The request shall state the reasons for the interview and shall schedule an informal interview at least ten days from after the date that the department sends the request for an interview. H. If the department determines that evidence warrants action or if the ambulance service refuses to attend the informal interview, the director shall institute formal proceedings and hold a hearing pursuant to title 41, chapter 6, article 10. I. If the department believes that a lesser disciplinary action is appropriate, the department may enter into a stipulated agreement with the ambulance service. This stipulation may include a civil penalty as provided under subsection J of this section. J. In addition to other disciplinary action provided under this section, the director may impose a civil penalty of not more than three hundred fifty dollars $350 for each violation of this chapter that constitutes grounds to suspend or revoke a certificate of necessity.  This penalty shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars $15,000. Each day that a violation occurs constitutes a separate offense. The director shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all monies collected under this subsection in the emergency medical services operating fund established under by section 36-2218. K. The director may suspend a certificate of necessity without holding a hearing if the director determines that the certificate holder has failed to pay a civil penalty imposed under this section. The director shall reinstate the certificate of necessity when the certificate holder pays the penalty in full. L. Except as provided in section 41-1092.08, subsection H, a final decision of the department pursuant to this section is subject to judicial review pursuant to title 12, chapter 7, article 6. M. Information, documents and records received by the department or prepared by the department in connection with an investigation that is conducted pursuant to this article and that relates to emergency medical care technicians are confidential and are not subject to public inspection or civil discovery.  When the investigation has been completed and the investigation file has been closed, the results of the investigation and the decision of the department shall be available to the public.  This subsection does not prevent the department from submitting information in compliance with the emergency medical services personnel licensure interstate compact as required by section 36-2259.END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 36, chapter 21.1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 2.1, to read: ARTICLE 2.1. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PERSONNEL LICENSURE INTERSTATE COMPACT START_STATUTE36-2259. Emergency medical services licensure interstate compact SECTION 1. PURPOSE The purpose of this compact is to protect the public through verification of competency and to ensure accountability for patient care-related activities of all states' licensed emergency medical services (EMS) personnel, such as emergency medical technicians (EMTs), advanced emergency medical technicians (AEMTs) and paramedics. This compact is intended to facilitate the day-to-day movement of EMS personnel across state boundaries in the performance of their EMS duties as assigned by an appropriate authority and to authorize state EMS offices to afford immediate legal recognition to EMS personnel who are licensed in a member state.  This compact recognizes that states have a vested interest in protecting the public's health and safety through their licensing and regulation of EMS personnel and that such state regulation shared among the member states will best protect the public health and safety.  This compact is designed to achieve the following purposes and objectives: 1. Increase public access to EMS personnel. 2. Enhance the states' ability to protect the public's health and safety, especially patient safety. 3. Encourage the cooperation of member states in the areas of EMS personnel licensure and regulation. 4. Support the licensing of military members who are separating from an active duty tour and the spouses of those military members. 5. Facilitate the exchange of information between member states regarding EMS personnel licensure, adverse actions and significant investigatory information. 6. Promote compliance with the laws governing EMS personnel practice in each member state. 7. Invest all member states with the authority to hold EMS personnel accountable through the mutual recognition of member state licenses. SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS In this compact, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Advanced emergency medical technician" or "AEMT" means an individual who is licensed with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice that corresponds to that level in the national EMS education standards and national EMS scope of practice model. 2. "Adverse action" means: (a) Any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action allowed by a state's laws that may be imposed against licensed EMS personnel by a state EMS authority or state court. (b) Includes actions against an individual's license such as revocation, suspension, probation, a consent agreement, monitoring or another limitation or encumbrance on the individual's practice, a letter of reprimand or admonition, a fine, a criminal conviction and a state court judgment enforcing adverse actions by the state EMS authority. 3. "Alternative program" means a voluntary, nondisciplinary substance abuse recovery program that is approved by a state EMS authority. 4. "Certification" means the successful verification of entry-level cognitive and psychomotor competency using a reliable, validated and legally defensible examination. 5. "Commission" means the national administrative body of which all states that have enacted this compact are members. 6. "Emergency medical technician" or "EMT" means an individual who is licensed with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice that corresponds to that level in the national EMS education standards and national EMS scope of practice model. 7. "Home state" means a member state where an individual is licensed to practice emergency medical services. 8. "License" means the authorization by a state for an individual to practice as an EMT, AEMT or paramedic or at a level in between EMT and paramedic. 9. "Medical director" means a physician who is licensed in a member state and who is accountable for the care delivered by EMS personnel. 10. "Member state" means a state that has enacted this compact. 11. "Paramedic" means an individual who is licensed with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice that corresponds to that level in the national EMS education standards and national EMS scope of practice model. 12. "Privilege to practice" means an individual's authority to deliver emergency medical services in remote states as authorized under this compact. 13. "Remote State" means a member state in which an individual is not licensed. 14. "Restricted" means the outcome of an adverse action that limits a license or the privilege to practice. 15. "Rule" means a written statement of the Commission that is promulgated pursuant to Section 12 of this compact and that: (a) Is of general applicability. (b) Implements, interprets or prescribes a policy or provision of this compact. (c) Is an organizational, procedural or practice requirement of the commission and has the force and effect of statutory law in a member state. (d) Includes the amendment, repeal or suspension of an existing rule. 16. "Scope of practice" means defined parameters of various duties or services that may be provided by an individual with specific credentials and that, whether regulated by rule, statute or court decision, tend to represent the limits of services the individual may perform. 17. "Significant investigatory information" means either: (a) Investigative information that a state EMS authority, after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity to respond if required by state law, has reason to believe, if proved true, would result in the imposition of an adverse action on a license or privilege to practice. (b) Investigative information that indicates that an individual represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the individual has been notified and had an opportunity to respond. 18. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district or territory of the United States. 19. "State EMS authority" means the board, office or other agency with the legislative mandate to license EMS personnel. SECTION 3. HOME STATE LICENSURE A. Any member state in which an individual holds a current license is deemed a home state for the purposes of this compact. B. Any member state may require an individual to obtain and retain a license to be authorized to practice in the member state under circumstances not authorized by the privilege to practice under the terms of this compact. C. A home state's issuance of a license authorizes an individual to practice in a remote state under the privilege to practice only if the home state meets all of the following: 1. Currently requires the use of the national registry of emergency medical technicians (NREMT) examination as a condition of issuing initial licenses at the EMT and paramedic levels. 2. Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about individuals. 3. Notifies the commission, in compliance with the terms prescribed in this compact, of any adverse action or significant investigatory information regarding an individual. 4. Not later than five years after activation of this compact, requires a criminal background check of all applicants for initial licensure, including the use of the results of fingerprint or other biometric data checks compliant with the requirements of the federal bureau of investigation, with the exception of federal employees who have suitability determination in accordance with 5 Code of Federal regulations section 731.202 and who submit documentation of such as promulgated in the rules of the commission. 5. Complies with the rules of the commission. SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE A. Member states shall recognize the privilege to practice of an individual who is licensed in another member state that is in conformance with section 3 of this compact. B. To exercise the privilege to practice under the terms and provisions of this compact, an individual must meet all of the following: 1. Be at least eighteen years of age. 2. Possess a current unrestricted license in a member state as an EMT, AEMT, paramedic or state recognized and licensed level with a scope of practice and authority between EMT and paramedic. 3. Practice under the supervision of a medical director. C. An individual providing patient care in a remote state under the privilege to practice shall function within the scope of practice authorized by the home state unless and until modified by an appropriate authority in the remote state as may be defined in the rules of the commission. D. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, an individual practicing in a remote state is subject to the remote state's authority and laws. A remote state, in accordance with due process and that state's laws, may restrict, suspend or revoke an individual's privilege to practice in the remote state and may take any other necessary actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens.  If a remote state takes action, it shall promptly notify the home state and the commission. E. If an individual's license in any home state is restricted or suspended, the individual is not eligible to practice in a remote state under the privilege to practice until the individual's home state license is restored. F. If an individual's privilege to practice in any remote state is restricted, suspended or revoked, the individual is not eligible to practice in any remote state until the individual's privilege to practice is restored. SECTION 5. CONDITIONS OF PRACTICE IN A REMOTE STATE An individual may practice in a remote state under a privilege to practice only in the performance of the individual's EMS duties as assigned by an appropriate authority, as defined in the rules of the commission, and under the following circumstances: 1. The individual originates a patient transport in a home state and transports the patient to a remote state. 2. The individual originates in the home state and enters a remote state to pick up a patient and provide care and transport of the patient to the home state. 3. The individual enters a remote state to provide patient care or transport, or both, within that remote state. 4. The individual enters a remote state to pick up a patient and provide care and transport to a third member state. 5. Other conditions as determined by rules promulgated by the commission. SECTION 6. RELATIONSHIP TO EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE COMPACT On the declaration by a member state's governor of a state of emergency or disaster that activates the emergency management assistance compact (EMAC), all relevant terms and provisions of EMAC apply and, to the extent any terms or provisions of this Compact conflict with EMAC, the terms of EMAC shall prevail with respect to any individual practicing in the remote state in response to the declaration. SECTION 7. VETERANS AND MILITARY SERVICE MEMBERS SEPARATING FROM ACTIVE DUTY AND THEIR SPOUSES A. Member states shall consider a veteran, active military service member and member of the national guard and reserves separating from an active duty tour, and the spouse of any of these, who holds a current valid and unrestricted NREMT certification at or above the level of the state license being sought as satisfying the minimum training and examination requirements for such licensure. B. Member states shall expedite the processing of licensure applications submitted by veterans, active military service members and members of the national guard and reserves separating from an active duty tour, and their spouses. C. All individuals functioning with a privilege to practice under this section remain subject to the adverse actions provisions of section 8 of this compact. SECTION 8. ADVERSE ACTIONS A. A home state has exclusive power to impose adverse action against an individual's license issued by the home state. B. If an individual's license in any home state is restricted or suspended, the individual is not eligible to practice in a remote state under the privilege to practice until the individual's home state license is restored, and the following apply: 1. All home state adverse action orders shall include a statement that the individual's privilege to practice is inactive. The order may allow the individual to practice in remote states with prior written authorization from both the home state EMS authority and the remote state EMS authority. 2. An individual who is currently subject to adverse action in the home state shall not practice in any remote state without prior written authorization from both the home state ems authority and the remote state EMS authority. C. A member state shall report adverse actions and any occurrences that the individual's privilege to practice is restricted, suspended or revoked to the commission in accordance with the rules of the commission. D. A remote state may take adverse action on an individual's privilege to practice within that state. E. Any member state may take adverse action against an individual's privilege to practice in that state based on the factual findings of another member state so long as each state follows its own procedures for imposing such adverse action. F. A home state's EMS authority shall investigate and take appropriate action with respect to reported conduct in a remote state as it would if such conduct had occurred within the home state. In such cases, the home state's law shall control in determining the appropriate adverse action. G. This compact does not override a member state's decision that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action and that such participation shall remain nonpublic if required by the member state's laws. Member states shall require individuals who enter any alternative programs to agree not to practice in any other member state during the term of the alternative program without prior authorization from the other member state. SECTION 9. ADDITIONAL POWERS INVESTED IN A MEMBER STATE'S EMS AUTHORITY A member state's EMS authority, in addition to any other powers granted under state law, is authorized under this compact to: 1. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a member state's EMS authority for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another member state, or both, shall be enforced in the remote state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to that court's practice and procedure in considering subpoenas issued in its own proceedings. The issuing state EMS authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of the state where the witnesses or evidence, or both, are located. 2. Issue cease and desist orders to restrict, suspend or revoke an individual's privilege to practice in the member state. SECTION 10. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR EMS PERSONNEL PRACTICE A. The compact states hereby create and establish a joint public agency known as the interstate commission for EMS personnel practice. The following apply: 1. The commission is a body politic and an instrumentality of the compact states. 2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. 3. This compact is not a waiver of sovereign immunity. B. Membership, voting and meetings are as follows: 1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one delegate. The responsible official of the state EMS authority or the state EMS authority's designee shall be the delegate to this compact for each member state. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from which the delegate is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the member state in which the vacancy exists. In the event that more than one board, office or other agency with the legislative mandate to license EMS personnel at and above the level of EMT exists, the governor of that state will determine which entity will be responsible for assigning the delegate. 2. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the commission. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates' participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication. 3. The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws. 4. All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in section 12 of this compact. 5. The commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the commission must discuss any of the following: (a) Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the compact. (b) The employment, compensation, discipline or other personnel matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the commission's internal personnel practices and procedures. (c) The current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation. (d) The negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services or real estate. (e) The accusation of any person of a crime or the formal censure of any person. (f) The disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential. (g) The disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy. (h) The disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes. (i) The disclosure of information related to any investigatory reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the commission or another committee charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to this compact. (j) Any matter specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state statute. 6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this subsection, the commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in the closed meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the commission or an order of a court of competent jurisdiction. C. The commission, by a majority vote of the delegates, shall prescribe bylaws or rules, or both, to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of this compact, including: 1. Establishing the fiscal year of the commission. 2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures: (a) For the establishment and meetings of other committees. (b) Governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the commission. 3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings and providing an opportunity for attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public's interest, the privacy of individuals and proprietary information, including trade secrets. The commission may meet in closed session only after a majority of the membership votes to close a meeting in whole or in part.  As soon as practicable, the commission shall make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing the vote of each member with no proxy votes allowed. 4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority and reasonable procedures for electing the officers of the commission. 5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for establishING the personnel policies and programs of the commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any member state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of the commission. 6. Promulgating a code of ethics to address permissible and prohibited activities of commission members and employees. 7. Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus monies that may exist after the termination of thIS compact after the payment or reserving of all of THE COMMISSION'S debts OR obligations, or both. 8. publishING THE COMMISSION'S bylaws and FILING a copy thereof, and a copy of any amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency or officer in each member state, if any. 9. maintainING THE COMMISSION'S financial records in accordance with the bylaws. 10. meetING and takING such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws. D. The commission shall have the following powers: 1. to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and administration of this compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all member states. 2. To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any state EMS authority or other regulatory body responsible for EMS personnel licensure to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected. 3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds. 4. To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel, including employees of a member state. 5. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of THIS compact, and to establish the Commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters. 6. To accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of monies, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive, use and dispose of the same, provided that at all times the commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety and conflict of interest. 7. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real, personal or mixed, provided that at all times the Commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety. 8. To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal or mixed. 9. To establish a budget and make expenditures. 10. To borrow monies. 11. To appoint committees, including advisory committees composed of members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in this compact and the bylaws. 12. To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law enforcement agencies. 13. To adopt and use an official seal. 14. To perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the state regulation of EMS personnel licensure and practice. E. Financing of the commission is as follows: 1. The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activities. 2. The commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources, donations and grants of monies, equipment, supplies, materials and services. 3. The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based on a formula to be determined by the commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding on all member states. 4. The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind before securing the monies adequate to meet the obligations. The commission shall not pledge the credit of any member state, except by and with the authority of the member state. 5. The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission ARE subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of monies handled by the Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission. F. Qualified immunity, defense and indemnification are as follows: 1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the commission ARE immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that this paragraph does not protect any such person from suit or liability, or both, for any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or wilful or wanton misconduct of that person. 2. The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that this paragraph does not prohibit that person from retaining the person's own counsel, and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from that person's intentional or wilful or wanton misconduct. 3. The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from the intentional or wilful or wanton misconduct of that person. SECTION 11. COORDINATED DATABASE A. The commission shall provide for the development and maintenance of a coordinated database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse action and significant investigatory information on all licensed individuals in member states. B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the coordinated database on all individuals to whom this compact APPLIES as required by the rules of the commission, including: 1. Identifying information. 2. Licensure data. 3. Significant investigatory information. 4. Adverse actions against a license. 5. An indicator that a privilege to practice is restricted, suspended or revoked. 6. Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation. 7. Any denial of AN application for licensure and the reason or reasons for such denial. 8. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact, as determined by the rules of the commission. C. The coordinated database administrator shall promptly notify all member states of any adverse action taken against, or significant investigative information on, any individual in a member state. D. a Member state THAT CONTRIBUTES information to the coordinated database may designate information that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of THAT MEMBER state. E. Any information submitted to the coordinated database that is subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the member state contributing the information shall be removed from the coordinated database. SECTION 12. RULEMAKING A. The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment. B. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule by enactING a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt thIS compact, that rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state. C. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission. D. bEFORE THE COMMISSION PROMULGATES AND ADOPTS a final rule or rules, and at least sixty days before the meeting at which the rule OR RULES will be considered and voted on, the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking: 1. On the website of the Commission. 2. On the website of each member state EMS authority or IN the publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules. E. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include all of the following: 1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule OR RULES will be considered and voted on. 2. The text of the proposed rule OR RULES or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule OR RULES. 3. A request for comments on the proposed rule OR RULES from any interested person. 4. The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments. F. Before ADOPTING a proposed rule, the commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public. G. The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is requested by any of the following: 1. At least twenty-five persons. 2. A governmental subdivision or agency. 3. An association having at least twenty-five members. H. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, the commission shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled public hearing, and the following apply: 1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall notify the executive director of the commission or other designated member in writing at least five business days before the scheduled date of the hearing of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing. 2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. 3. A transcript of the hearing is not required unless a written request for a transcript is made, in which case the person requesting the transcript shall bear the cost of producing the transcript.  A recording may be made in lieu of a transcript under the same terms and conditions as a transcript. This paragraph does not preclude the commission from making a transcript or recording of the hearing if it so chooses. 4. This section does not require a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings required by this section. I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the commission shall consider all written and oral comments received. J. The commission, by majority vote of all members, shall take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule. K. If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing by interested parties is received, the commission may proceed with promulgatING the proposed rule without a public hearing. L. On A determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in thIS compact and in this section ARE retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this SUBSECTION, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to do any of the following: 1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare. 2. Prevent a loss of commission or member state monies. 3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule. 4. Protect THE public health and safety. M. The commission or an authorized committee of the commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency or grammatical errors.  Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission.  The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule.  A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR of the commission BEFORE the end of the notice period.  If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action.  If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the commission. SECTION 13. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT A. Oversight OF THE COMMISSION is as follows: 1. The executive, legislative and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate thIS compact's purposes and intent. This compact and the rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law. 2. All courts shall take judicial notice of thIS compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of this compact, which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the commission. 3. The commission IS entitled to receive service of process in any such proceeding and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes.  Failure to provide service of process to the commission renderS a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact or promulgated rules. B. Default, technical assistance and termination are as follows: 1. If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall: (a) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default and any other action to be taken by the Commission. (b) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default. 2. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from thIS compact on an affirmative vote of a majority of the member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default. 3. Termination of membership in thIS compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted.  Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state's legislature and each member state. 4. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination. 5. The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from thIS compact, unless agreed on in writing between the commission and the defaulting state. 6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United States district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing member STATE shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. C. Dispute Resolution is as follows: 1. On request by a member state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to thIS compact that arise among member states and between member and nonmember states. 2. The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate. D. Enforcement is as follows: 1. The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact. 2. By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices against a member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. If judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member STATE shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. 3. The remedies prescribed in this compact shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law. SECTION 14. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR EMS PERSONNEL PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED RULES, WITHDRAWAL AND AMENDMENT A. ThIS compact IS EFFECTIVE on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state.  The provisions, which become effective at that time, shall be limited to the powers granted to the commission relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary to implement and administer this compact. B. Any state that joins thIS compact AFTER the commission's initial adoption of the rules IS subject to the rules as they exist on the date on which thIS compact becomes law in that state.  Any rule that has been previously adopted by the commission HAS the full force and effect of law on the day thIS compact becomes law in that state. C. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, and the following apply: 1. A member state's withdrawal DOES not take effect until six months after enactment of the repealing statute. 2. Withdrawal DOES not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state's EMS authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this act before the effective date of withdrawal. D. This compact does not invalidate or prevent any EMS personnel licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a nonmember state that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact. E. This compact may be amended by the member states.  aN amendment to this compact DOES NOT become effective and binding on any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states. SECTION 15. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes of this compact. If this compact IS held contrary to the constitution of any state member thereto, thIS compact remainS in full force and effect as to the remaining member states. This compact does not supersede state law or rules related to licensure of EMS agencies. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 41-619.51, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-619.51. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Agency" means the supreme court, the department of economic security, the department of child safety, the department of education, the department of health services, the department of juvenile corrections, the department of emergency and military affairs, the department of public safety, the department of transportation, the state real estate department, the department of insurance and financial institutions, the Arizona game and fish department, the Arizona department of agriculture, the board of examiners of nursing care institution administrators and assisted living facility managers, the state board of dental examiners, the Arizona state board of pharmacy, the board of physical therapy, the state board of psychologist examiners, the board of athletic training, the board of occupational therapy examiners, the state board of podiatry examiners, the acupuncture board of examiners, the state board of technical registration, the board of massage therapy, the board of behavioral health examiners or the Arizona department of housing. 2. "Board" means the board of fingerprinting. 3. "Central registry exception" means notification to the department of economic security, the department of child safety or the department of health services, as appropriate, pursuant to section 41-619.57 that the person is not disqualified because of a central registry check conducted pursuant to section 8-804. 4. "Expedited review" means an examination, in accordance with board rule, of the documents an applicant submits by the board or its hearing officer without the applicant being present. 5. "Good cause exception" means the issuance of a fingerprint clearance card to an employee pursuant to section 41-619.55. 6. "Person" means a person who is required to be fingerprinted pursuant to this article or who is subject to a central registry check and any of the following: (a) Section 3-314. (b) Section 8-105. (c) Section 8-322. (d) Section 8-463. (e) Section 8-509. (f) Section 8-802. (g) Section 8-804. (h) Section 15-183. (i) Section 15-503. (j) Section 15-512. (k) Section 15-534. (l) Section 15-763.01. (m) Section 15-782.02. (n) Section 15-1330. (o) Section 15-1881. (p) Section 17-215. (q) Section 28-3228. (r) Section 28-3413. (s) Section 32-122.02. (t) Section 32-122.05. (u) Section 32-122.06. (v) Section 32-823. (w) Section 32-1232. (x) Section 32-1276.01. (y) Section 32-1284. (z) Section 32-1297.01. (aa) Section 32-1904. (bb) Section 32-1941. (cc) Section 32-1982. (dd) Section 32-2022. (ee) Section 32-2063. (ff) Section 32-2108.01. (gg) Section 32-2123. (hh) Section 32-2371. (ii) Section 32-3271. (jj) Section 32-3430. (kk) Section 32-3620. (ll) Section 32-3668. (mm) Section 32-3669. (nn) Section 32-3922. (oo) Section 32-3924. (pp) Section 32-4128. (qq) Section 32-4222. (rr) Section 36-113. (ss) Section 36-207. (tt) Section 36-411. (uu) Section 36-425.03. (vv) Section 36-446.04. (ww) Section 36-594.01. (xx) Section 36-594.02. (yy) Section 36-766.01. (zz) Section 36-882. (aaa) Section 36-883.02. (bbb) Section 36-897.01. (ccc) Section 36-897.03. (ddd) Section 36-1940. (eee) Section 36-1940.01. (fff) Section 36-2069. (ggg) Section 36-2202. (ggg) (hhh) Section 36-3008. (hhh) (iii) Section 41-619.53. (iii) (jjj) Section 41-1964. (jjj) (kkk) Section 41-1967.01. (kkk) (lll) Section 41-1968. (lll) (mmm) Section 41-1969. (mmm) (nnn) Section 41-2814. (nnn) (ooo) Section 41-4025. (ooo) (ppp) Section 46-141, subsection A or B. (ppp) (qqq) Section 46-321.END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 41-1758, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1758. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Agency" means the supreme court, the department of economic security, the department of child safety, the department of education, the department of health services, the department of juvenile corrections, the department of emergency and military affairs, the department of public safety, the department of transportation, the state real estate department, the department of insurance and financial institutions, the board of fingerprinting, the Arizona game and fish department, the Arizona department of agriculture, the board of examiners of nursing care institution administrators and assisted living facility managers, the state board of dental examiners, the Arizona state board of pharmacy, the board of physical therapy, the state board of psychologist examiners, the board of athletic training, the board of occupational therapy examiners, the state board of podiatry examiners, the acupuncture board of examiners, the state board of technical registration, the board of massage therapy, the board of behavioral health examiners or the Arizona department of housing. 2. "Division" means the fingerprinting division in the department of public safety. 3. "Electronic or internet-based fingerprinting services" means a secure system for digitizing applicant fingerprints and transmitting the applicant data and fingerprints of a person or entity submitting fingerprints to the department of public safety for any authorized purpose under this title. For the purposes of this paragraph, "secure system" means a system that complies with the information technology security policy approved by the department of public safety. 4. "Good cause exception" means the issuance of a fingerprint clearance card to an applicant pursuant to section 41-619.55. 5. "Person" means a person who is required to be fingerprinted pursuant to any of the following: (a) Section 3-314. (b) Section 8-105. (c) Section 8-322. (d) Section 8-463. (e) Section 8-509. (f) Section 8-802. (g) Section 15-183. (h) Section 15-503. (i) Section 15-512. (j) Section 15-534. (k) Section 15-763.01. (l) Section 15-782.02. (m) Section 15-1330. (n) Section 15-1881. (o) Section 17-215. (p) Section 28-3228. (q) Section 28-3413. (r) Section 32-122.02. (s) Section 32-122.05. (t) Section 32-122.06. (u) Section 32-823. (v) Section 32-1232. (w) Section 32-1276.01. (x) Section 32-1284. (y) Section 32-1297.01. (z) Section 32-1904. (aa) Section 32-1941. (bb) Section 32-1982. (cc) Section 32-2022. (dd) Section 32-2063. (ee) Section 32-2108.01. (ff) Section 32-2123. (gg) Section 32-2371. (hh) Section 32-3271. (ii) Section 32-3430. (jj) Section 32-3620. (kk) Section 32-3668. (ll) Section 32-3669. (mm) Section 32-3922. (nn) Section 32-3924. (oo) Section 32-4128. (pp) Section 32-4222. (qq) Section 36-113. (rr) Section 36-207. (ss) Section 36-411. (tt) Section 36-425.03. (uu) Section 36-446.04. (vv) Section 36-594.01. (ww) Section 36-594.02. (xx) Section 36-766.01. (yy) Section 36-882. (zz) Section 36-883.02. (aaa) Section 36-897.01. (bbb) Section 36-897.03. (ccc) Section 36-1940. (ddd) Section 36-1940.01. (eee) Section 36-2069. (fff) Section 36-2202. (fff) (ggg) Section 36-3008. (ggg) (hhh) Section 41-619.52. (hhh) (iii) Section 41-619.53. (iii) (jjj) Section 41-1964. (jjj) (kkk) Section 41-1967.01. (kkk) (lll) Section 41-1968. (lll) (mmm) Section 41-1969. (mmm) (nnn) Section 41-2814. (nnn) (ooo) Section 41-4025. (ooo) (ppp) Section 46-141, subsection A or B. (ppp) (qqq) Section 46-321. 6. "Rap back services" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-1750. 7. "Vulnerable adult" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-3623.END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 41-1758.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1758.01. Fingerprinting division; powers and duties A. The fingerprinting division is established in the department of public safety and shall: 1. Conduct fingerprint background checks for persons and applicants who are seeking licenses from state agencies, employment with licensees, contract providers and state agencies or employment or educational opportunities with agencies that require fingerprint background checks pursuant to sections 3-314, 8-105, 8-322, 8-463, 8-509, 8-802, 15-183, 15-503, 15-512, 15-534, 15-763.01, 15-782.02, 15-1330, 15-1881, 17-215, 28-3228, 28-3413, 32-122.02, 32-122.05, 32-122.06, 32-823, 32-1232, 32-1276.01, 32-1284, 32-1297.01, 32-1904, 32-1941, 32-1982, 32-2022, 32-2063, 32-2108.01, 32-2123, 32-2371, 32-3271, 32-3430, 32-3620, 32-3668, 32-3669, 32-3922, 32-3924, 32-4128, 32-4222, 36-113, 36-207, 36-411, 36-425.03, 36-446.04, 36-594.01, 36-594.02, 36-766.01, 36-882, 36-883.02, 36-897.01, 36-897.03, 36-1940, 36-1940.01, 36-2069, 36-2202, 36-3008, 41-619.52, 41-619.53, 41-1964, 41-1967.01, 41-1968, 41-1969, 41-2814 and 41-4025, section 46-141, subsection A or B and section 46-321. 2. Issue fingerprint clearance cards. On issuance, a fingerprint clearance card becomes the personal property of the cardholder and the cardholder shall retain possession of the fingerprint clearance card. 3. On submission of an application for a fingerprint clearance card, collect the fees established by the board of fingerprinting pursuant to section 41-619.53 and deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, the monies collected in the board of fingerprinting fund. 4. Inform in writing each person who submits fingerprints for a fingerprint background check of the right to petition the board of fingerprinting for a good cause exception pursuant to section 41-1758.03, 41-1758.04 or 41-1758.07. 5. If after conducting a state and federal criminal history records check the division determines that it is not authorized to issue a fingerprint clearance card to a person, inform the person in writing that the division is not authorized to issue a fingerprint clearance card. The notice shall include the criminal history information on which the denial was based. This criminal history information is subject to dissemination restrictions pursuant to section 41-1750 and Public Law 92-544. 6. Notify the person in writing if the division suspends, revokes or places a driving restriction notation on a fingerprint clearance card pursuant to section 41-1758.04. The notice shall include the criminal history information on which the suspension, revocation or placement of the driving restriction notation was based. This criminal history information is subject to dissemination restrictions pursuant to section 41-1750 and Public Law 92-544. 7. Administer and enforce this article. B. The fingerprinting division may contract for electronic or internet-based fingerprinting services through an entity or entities for the acquisition and transmission of applicant fingerprint and data submissions to the department, including identity verified fingerprints pursuant to section 15-106. The entity or entities contracted by the department of public safety may charge the applicant a fee for services provided pursuant to this article. The entity or entities contracted by the department of public safety shall comply with: 1. All information privacy and security measures and submission standards established by the department of public safety. 2. The information technology security policy approved by the department of public safety. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.